pl: Opakowanie karty kolekcjonerskiej: Opakowanie blistrowe; Pakiet booster; Pudło; Talia startowa; Cyna; Inne
th: บรรจุภัณฑ์การ์ดสะสม: บลิสเตอร์แพค; ซองการ์ด; กล่อง; เด็คเริ่มต้น; ภาชนะดีบุก; อื่นๆ
vi: Bao bì thẻ trao đổi: Vỉ; Bao bì ở vỉ; Hộp; Bộ thẻ khởi đầu; Hộp thiếc; Khác
hr-HR: Pakiranje sličica: Blister pakiranje; Posebno pakiranje; Kutija; Početni komplet; Lim; Ostalo
it: Imballaggio delle figurine: Confezione blister; Pacchetto di carte; Scatola; Mazzo iniziale; Stagno; Altro
lt-LT: Kolekcinių kortelių pakuotė: Lizdinė pakuotė; Papildymo pakuotė; Dėžutė; Pradinis rinkinys; Skardinė; Kita
en: Trading card packaging: Blister pack; Booster pack; Box; Starter deck; Tin; Other
ja: トレーディングカードのパッケージ: ブリスターパック; ブースターパック; ボックス; スターターパック; 缶; その他
tr: Ticaret kartı ambalajı: Kabarcık paketi; Takviye paketi; Kutu; Başlangıç destesi; Teneke; Diğer
pt-PT: Embalagem de cartas colecionáveis: Pacote almofadado; Pacote de reforço; Caixa; Baralhos iniciais; Lata; Outro
nl: Verpakking ruilkaarten: Blisterverpakking; Boosterpakket; Box; Starterdeck; Tin; Andere
sk-SK: Balenie zberateľských kariet: Blistrové balenie; Booster pack; Škatuľa; Štartovacia paluba; Plech; Iné
ko: 트레이딩 카드 포장: 블리스터 팩; 부스터 팩; 상자; 스타터 덱; 통조림; 기타
da: Byttekortemballage: Blisterpakning; Booster-pakke; Boks; Starterdæk; Tindåse; Andet
sv: Samlarkortsförpackning: Blisterförpackning; Boosterförpackning; Låda; Startsats; Burk; Övrigt
pt-BR: Embalagem de cartão colecionável: Embalagem bolha; Pacote de reforço; Caixa; Baralho iniciante; Lata; Outro
fr: Emballage de cartes à collectionner: Paquet en blister; Paquet de booster; Boîte; Deck de démarrage; Étain; Autre
hu: Gyűjthető kártyák csomagolása: Buborékcsomagolás; Erősítőcsomag; Doboz; Kezdőpakli; Ón; Egyéb
sl-SI: Embalaža izmenjevalne kartice: Pretisni omot; Booster paket; Škatla; Začetne karte; Pločevina; Drugo
es: Embalaje de tarjetas coleccionables: Paquete de blíster; Paquete de refuerzo; Caja; Mazo de inicio; Lata; Otros
fi: Keräilykuvien pakkaus: Läpipainopakkaus; Tehostuspakkaus; Laatikko; Aloituskorttipakka; Tölkki; Muu
zh-CN: 交易卡包装: 泡罩包装; 扩充包; 箱; 初级套装; 锡; 其他
bg-BG: Опаковка за карти за размяна: Блистерна опаковка; Бустер опаковка; Кутия; Стартова колода; Консерва; Други
cs: Balení sběratelských karet: Blistrové balení; Booster balíček; Krabice; Startovací balíček; Konzerva; Jiné
ru: Упаковка коллекционных карточек: Блистерная упаковка; Бустерная упаковка; Коробка; Стартовая колода; Жестяная банка; Другое
zh-TW: 收藏卡片包材: 吸塑包裝; 補充包; 盒; 初階牌組; 錫; 其他
nb: Samlekortemballasje: Blisterpakning; Boosterpakke; Eske; Startdekk; Tinn; Annet
ro-RO: Ambalaj cartonașe de colecție pentru schimburi: Blister pack; Booster pack; Cutie; Starter deck; Staniu; Altele
de: Sammelkartenverpackung: Blisterpackung; Booster-Pack; Kasten; Starterdeck; Blechdose; Sonstiges
el: Συσκευασία καρτών συναλλαγών: Συσκευασία blister; Booster pack; Κουτί; Κατάστρωμα εκκίνησης; Κασσίτερος; Άλλο